Rhode Island, session 2025, SB783.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-53.1-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-53.1 entitled "Solicitation
by Charitable Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-53.1-4. Reports and records of registered charitable organizations.
(a) Every charitable organization registered pursuant to § 5-53.1-2 shall file with the
director a copy of the annual financial statement of the organization audited by an independent
certified public accountant for the organization’s immediately preceding fiscal year, or a copy of a
financial statement audited by an independent certified public accountant covering, in a
consolidated report, complete information as to all the preceding year’s fundraising activities of the
charitable organization, showing kind and amount of funds raised, costs and expenses incidental
thereto, and allocation or disbursements of funds raised. Charitable organizations having annual
gross income of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) one million dollars ($1,000,000) or less
shall be considered to have met the financial requirements of this section by providing either an
IRS Form 990 or the following financial statements for the immediately preceding fiscal year
compiled by an independent public or certified accountant:
(1) Statement of activities; and
(2) Statement of financial position.
(b) The director may require audited, annual financial statements of charitable
organizations with budgets of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) one million dollars

($1,000,000) or less when the director has reasonable cause to believe that a violation of this chapter
has occurred.
(c) Any charitable organization registered pursuant to § 5-53.1-2 that is the parent
organization of one or more affiliates within the state, may comply with the reporting requirements
of subsection (a) of this section by filing a combined, written report upon forms prescribed by the
director.
(d) As used in this section, the term “affiliate” includes any chapter, branch, auxiliary, or
other subordinated unit of any registered charitable organization, however designated, whose
policies, fundraising activities, and expenditures are supervised or controlled by the parent.
(e) There shall be appended to each combined report a schedule, containing the information
that may be prescribed by the director reflecting the activities of each affiliate, that shall contain a
certification, under penalty of perjury, by an official of the organization, certifying that the
information contained therein is true.
(f) The failure of a parent organization to file an appropriate combined, written report shall
not excuse either the parent organization or its affiliates from complying with the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section.
(g) A combined report filed pursuant to this section shall be accompanied by a fee of
seventy-five dollars ($75.00) plus seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for each organization included in
the report.
(h) The director may accept a copy of a current annual report previously filed by a
charitable organization with any other governmental agency in compliance with the provisions of
this chapter; provided, that the report filed with the other governmental agency shall be
substantially similar in content to the report required by this section.
(i) The due date on which to submit financial information (IRS Form 990 or audited annual
financial statements) shall initially be extended until the IRS due date, and then until the IRS
extension dates, as necessary. For the initial request, the registrant shall submit to the department
an extension request letter with the annual registration form stating the IRS due date. For any further
extensions, the registrant shall submit an additional letter or a copy of the IRS request for an
extension form. The extensions apply to Form 990, the annual audited financial statement, and any
other information referred to in § 5-53.1-2(a)(9), (11) and (12). With respect to organizations that
submit compiled financial statements referred to in subsection (a) of this section, extensions will
be granted upon written request, totaling not more than six (6) months.
LC001682 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001682
========
LC001682 - Page 3 of 4